Utah statutes.
78B-5-617.   Writings bearing obvious alterations -- Explanation required.

(1)  The party producing as genuine a writing which has been altered, or appears to have been altered after its execution in a part material to the question in dispute must account for the appearance of alteration.

(2)  The party may show that the alteration:

(a)  was made by another without the party's concurrence;

(b)  was made with the consent of the parties affected by it;

(c)  was otherwise properly or innocently made; or

(d)  does not change the meaning or language of the instrument.

(3)  An altered writing that a party cannot adequately explain under Subsection (2) is not admissible.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

